Utah statutes.
16-11-8.   Officer, director, or shareholder shall be licensed professional
-- Nonlicensed person as secretary or treasurer.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a person may not be an
officer, director, or shareholder of a professional corporation unless that
person is:
(i)  an individual licensed to render the same specific professional services
as those for which the corporation is organized; or
(ii)  qualified to be an officer, director, or shareholder under the
applicable licensing act for the profession for which the corporation is
organized.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a nonlicensed person may serve as
secretary or treasurer of the professional corporation.
(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1), professional services are considered the
same specific professional services as those for which the corporation is
organized if:
(a)  the corporation is organized to provide services described in:
(i)  Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act; or
(ii)  Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act; and
(b)  the officer, director, or shareholder is licensed under either of the
chapters listed in Subsection (2)(a).
